Utah statutes.
61-1-1.   Fraud unlawful.

It is unlawful for any person, in connection with the offer, sale, or purchase of any security, directly or indirectly to:

(1)  employ any device, scheme, or artifice to defraud;

(2)  make any untrue statement of a material fact or to omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements made, in the light of the circumstances under which they are made, not misleading; or

(3)  engage in any act, practice, or course of business which operates or would operate as a fraud or deceit upon any person.



Amended by Chapter 284, 1983 General Session

